Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1108.13
State Building Administrator; oath.

The administrator shall, before entering upon the duties of his office, subscribe and take the constitutional oath of office, which shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

Laws 1974, LB 1048, § 4.